Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-543
Taxes; levy; Class A; submission to qualified voters of district.

To levy and collect taxes under Class A, the board shall, in each year, determine the amount of money necessary to be raised by taxation, taking into consideration other sources of revenue of the district, to supply funds for paying expenses of organization, for surveys and plans, and for paying the cost of constructing, operating, and maintaining the works of the district. The amount shall not exceed three and five-tenths cents on each one hundred dollars prior to the delivery of water from the works and thereafter shall not exceed seven cents on each one hundred dollars of the taxable value of the taxable property within the district, except that in the event of accruing defaults, deficiencies, or defaults and deficiencies, an additional levy may be made as provided in section 46-553.

The board shall, on or before September 30 of each year, certify to the county board of each county within the district or having a portion of its territory within the district the amount so fixed with direction that, at the time and in the manner required by law for levying of taxes for county purposes, such county board shall levy such tax upon the taxable value of the taxable property within the district in addition to such other taxes as may be levied by such county board at the rate required to produce the amount so fixed and determined.

No tax shall be levied and collected under Class A until the proposition of levying taxes has been submitted by a resolution of the board to the qualified electors of the district at an election held for that purpose in the same manner as provided for submission of incurring bonded indebtedness in sections 46-564 to 46-566, and when the proposition has been approved by a majority of the qualified electors of the district voting on the proposition at such election, thereafter the board shall be entitled to certify to the county board the amount of tax to be levied.

Laws 1947, c. 173, § 15(1), p. 539;

Laws 1969, c. 145, § 37, p. 695;

Laws 1979, LB 187, § 172;

Laws 1992, LB 1063, § 39;

Laws 1992, Second Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 39;

Laws 1993, LB 734, § 40;

Laws 1995, LB 452, § 13;

Laws 2021, LB644, § 18.

Nebraska Budget Act, see section 13-501.

Class A are general taxes, uniformly levied upon all tangible property within the district. Nebraska Mid-State Reclamation District v. Hall County, 152 Neb. 410, 41 N.W.2d 397 (1950).